Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0068.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 609k. (1) An off-premises retailer with a retail sales floor that exceeds 2,500 square feet shall not display co-branded alcoholic beverages abutting or otherwise having a common border with soft drinks, fruit juices, bottled water, candy, toys, or snack foods if the snack foods portray cartoons or youth-oriented images. (2) An off-premises retailer with a retail sales floor that is equal to or less than 2,500 square feet shall do either of the following: (a) Not display co-branded alcoholic beverages abutting or otherwise having a common border with soft drinks, fruit juices, bottled water, candy, toys, or snack foods if the snack foods portray cartoons or youth-oriented images. (b) Post signage that is clearly visible to consumers, is not less than 8.5 x 11 inches, and states the following: "THIS PRODUCT IS AN ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AVAILABLE ONLY TO PERSONS WHO ARE 21 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER." on any display that contains co-branded alcoholic beverages and is abutting or otherwise has a common border with soft drinks, fruit juices, bottled water, candy, toys, or snack foods if the snack foods portray cartoons or youth-oriented images. (3) Any fines ordered by the commission for a violation of this section must be deposited into the liquor control enforcement and license investigation revolving fund created under section 543. (4) As used in this section, "co-branded alcoholic beverage" means any alcoholic liquor that has the same or similar brand name, logo, or packaging as a nonalcoholic beverage.